Hawaii, session 2026, SB2967.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that artificial intelligence systems, including generative artificial intelligence services, are becoming integral to commerce, education, health care, finance, transportation, and government operations. When responsibly designed and governed, these technologies can improve productivity, expand access to services, reduce costs, and support faster, better-informed decision-making. The legislature further finds however, that the rapid deployment of artificial intelligence systems, often without mature controls, can erode foundational principles of security, oversight, and accountability.  Documented trends include hallucinations and other reliability failures; misuse of accessible data or application of irrelevant or low-quality data; poisoned or contaminated inputs that degrade outputs; and attempts by providers or deploying organizations to shift responsibility to end users or to an automated system to avoid accountability for errors and harms. The legislature further finds that consumers can face severe financial and reputational impacts when automated tools are used in customer-facing interactions or to support high-impact decisions.  Examples include: (1)  Use of automated vehicle damage scanning and scoring processes that can generate disputed or erroneous damage charges in rental-car transactions; and (2)  Well-documented harms from algorithmic scoring in housing and tenant screenings that can contribute to unfair outcomes and disparate impacts. The legislature further finds that basic, common-sense consumer protection standards can curb abuses while supporting responsible innovation, by clarifying accountability, requiring transparent disclosures, ensuring meaningful human review and a right to appeal when automated tools materially affect consumers, and requiring risk management and documentation proportionate to consumer risk. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish a technology-neutral framework that: (1)  Requires disclosure when artificial intelligence is used in consumer interactions and consequential decisions; (2)  Prohibits the use of artificial intelligence as a shield from responsibility for unfair or deceptive practices; (3)  Establishes rights to explanation, correction, appeal, and human review for certain automated decisions; and (4)  Requires reasonable governance, testing, monitoring, and cybersecurity controls to improve reliability, fairness, and consumer trust. SECTION 2. Chapter 480, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new part to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "Part .  Artificial intelligence consumer protections §480-A  Definitions.  As used in this part: "Adverse action" means a denial, reduction, termination, or other materially unfavorable change in, or refusal to provide, a product, service, price, term, or condition that is the result of, or is materially influenced by, a consequential decision. "Algorithmic discrimination" means the use of an artificial intelligence system or automated decision tool that contributes to unjustified differential treatment or unjustified differential impact that disfavors a person or class of persons on the basis of a characteristic protected by state or federal law. "Artificial intelligence system" or "AI system" means a machine-based system that, for a given set of objectives, generates outputs such as predictions, recommendations, content, classifications, scores, or similar outputs that influence decisions or behaviors in real or virtual environments, and that operates with varying levels of autonomy. "Automated decision tool" means a computational process, including one derived from machine learning, statistics, data analytics, or artificial intelligence, that issues an output used to make, inform, or materially influence a consequential decision. "Consequential decision" means a decision that determines or materially influences a consumer's access to, eligibility for, or the terms, conditions, or pricing of: (1)  Housing or rental screening, including a lease, tenancy, or occupancy determination; (2)  Credit, lending, or other financial services; (3)  Insurance; (4)  Employment, including hiring, promotion, termination, scheduling, compensation, or the assignment of work; (5)  Education admissions or educational opportunities; (6)  Health care services, including access to care, payment, or coverage determinations; (7)  Legal services provided to a consumer in a consumer-facing context; or (8)  Any other category designated by the director by rule as a consequential decision due to a comparable risk of material financial, reputational, or legal harm. "Deployer" means a person that uses, operates, or makes available an AI system or automated decision tool in the course of business in the State, including use through a vendor, when the system or tool is used to interact with a consumer or to make, inform, or materially influence a consequential decision. "Executive director" means the executive director of the office of consumer protection. "Generative artificial intelligence service" means an AI system that generates, in response to prompts or other inputs, content such as text, images, audio, video, computer code, or other synthetic output. "High-risk AI system" means an AI system or automated decision tool that is used to make, or is a substantial factor in making, a consequential decision. "Materially influence" means that an output is used in a manner that could change the outcome of a decision, the terms of a decision, or the process used to reach a decision, including use as a gatekeeping score, recommendation, ranking, classification, or flag. "Vendor" means a person that provides, licenses, hosts, maintains, or materially modifies an AI system or automated decision tool on behalf of a deployer. §480-B  Disclosure when interacting with an AI system.  (a)  A deployer that uses an AI system, including a generative artificial intelligence service, to interact with a consumer in a consumer-facing communication shall provide a clear and conspicuous disclosure, at the beginning of the interaction and at reasonable intervals as necessary to avoid deception, that the consumer is interacting with an AI system. (b) Subsection (a) shall not be construed to prohibit the use of a live human agent; provided that when a human agent joins or assumes control of the interaction, the deployer shall not misrepresent the identity of the agent. (c) The disclosure required by this section may be provided by text, audio, or another method reasonably calculated to be understood by the consumer given the communication channel. §480-C  Disclosures for consequential decisions; notice and explanation.  (a)  If a deployer uses a high-risk AI system to make, inform, or materially influence a consequential decision, the deployer shall provide the consumer, in plain language and in a timely manner: (1)  Notice that a high-risk AI system was used to make, inform, or materially influence the consequential decision; (2)  A description of the type of information used by the system and the primary factors that materially contributed to the decision; and (3)  Information describing how the consumer may request correction of inaccurate information, submit additional information, seek reconsideration, and obtain human review under section 480-D. (b)  The notice required by this section shall be provided: (1)  At or before the time of communicating an adverse action; or (2)  If no adverse action is communicated, upon request by the consumer within a reasonable period after the decision. (c)  This section shall not be construed to require a deployer to disclose proprietary source code or trade secrets; provided that the deployer shall provide a meaningful explanation sufficient for a reasonable consumer to understand the basis for the decision and the process to contest it. §480-D  Right to correction, appeal, and human review.  (a)  A deployer that uses a high-risk AI system to make, inform, or materially influence a consequential decision shall implement a reasonable process by which a consumer may: (1)  Request correction of inaccurate personal information used in the decision; (2)  Submit relevant information for reconsideration; and (3)  Obtain a human review of an adverse action. (b) Human review under this section shall be performed by an individual with authority to overturn the adverse action and with training reasonably related to the subject matter of the consequential decision. (c) A deployer shall provide a written response to a consumer request under this section within a reasonable period, and shall include: (1)  The outcome of the reconsideration; (2)  If the adverse action is upheld, an explanation of the basis for the determination in plain language; and (3)  Any additional steps available to the consumer through internal appeal, customer dispute channels, or applicable external rights. (d) This section shall not be construed to require a deployer to provide human review when doing so would: (1)  Prevent the deployer from complying with state or federal law; or (2)  Compromise the security or integrity of systems or fraud-prevention processes; provided that the deployer shall document the basis for invoking this subsection and shall provide the consumer with notice of the limitation and an alternative dispute channel reasonably available to the consumer. §480-E  AI user agreement; prohibited waivers.  (a)  A deployer that provides a consumer-facing AI interaction shall make available, prior to or at the time of interaction, a clear and conspicuous AI user agreement that describes, in plain language: (1)  The nature of the AI interaction and known material limitations of the AI system, including the risk of inaccurate or fabricated output; (2)  The categories of data collected from the consumer during the interaction and how the data will be used, retained, and shared; (3)  How a consumer may reach a human representative, submit a complaint, and dispute a charge, decision, or other outcome tied to the AI interaction; and (4)  Any material ways the deployer uses the AI interaction to make, inform, or materially influence consequential decisions. (b)  Any term in an AI user agreement that purports to waive, limit, or disclaim a deployers obligations under this part, or to waive a consumers rights or remedies under state law, shall be void. §480-F  Duty of reasonable care; risk management program for high-risk AI systems. (a)  A deployer and vendor shall use reasonable care to protect consumers from any known or reasonably foreseeable material risks of: (1)  Algorithmic discrimination; (2)  Material errors, including systematic reliability failures; and (3)  Cybersecurity and data integrity failures that materially affect the reliability or security of outputs. (b)  Before deploying a high-risk AI system, and throughout the period of deployment, a deployer shall implement and maintain a written risk management program that is risk-based and proportionate to the nature of the consequential decisions and the degree of potential harm to consumers, and that includes: (1)  Governance and accountability for AI system use, including designation of responsible personnel; (2)  Documented policies and procedures covering procurement, development, use, monitoring, incident response, and retirement of high-risk AI systems; (3)  Data governance controls addressing data quality, relevance, limitations, and reasonably practicable data lineage; (4)  Pre-deployment testing and ongoing monitoring designed to detect material errors, model drift, and algorithmic discrimination; (5)  Controls addressing vendor and third-party risks, including contract terms requiring reasonable cooperation with oversight, auditing, and consumer dispute handling; and (6)  Recordkeeping sufficient to demonstrate compliance with this part. (c)  At least annually, and upon any intentional and substantial modification of a high-risk AI system, a deployer shall complete an internal impact assessment that evaluates: (1)  The system's intended use and reasonably foreseeable misuse; (2)  The categories of data used and material limitations; (3)  The reasonably foreseeable risks of material consumer harm, including financial and reputational harm; (4)  The steps taken to mitigate material risks, including algorithmic discrimination; and (5)  A summary of monitoring results and identified material issues, if any. (d)  Impact assessments and risk management program documentation shall be retained for not less than five years after the system is retired or materially modified, whichever is later, and shall be made available to the executive director or the attorney general upon request; provided that confidential commercial information shall be protected to the extent permitted by law. §480-G  Documentation, consumer dispute records, and access to relevant outputs.  (a)  When an AI system output is used as a substantial factor in an adverse action, the deployer shall maintain documentation sufficient to: (1)  Identify the system used, the nature of the output relied upon, and the decision process; (2)  Support the disclosures required by section 480-C; and (3)  Support meaningful reconsideration and human review under section 480-D. (b) Upon request by a consumer and to the extent reasonably necessary to support dispute resolution, a deployer shall provide the consumer with access to relevant records, including a copy or summary of the information used by the high-risk AI system and the output that was relied upon as a substantial factor; provided that the deployer shall not be required to disclose proprietary source code or trade secrets. §480-H  Incident reporting.  (a)  A deployer shall notify the executive director and the attorney general within ninety days after discovering: (1)  A material violation of this part affecting a class of consumers; or (2)  That a high-risk AI system caused or materially contributed to algorithmic discrimination or other material consumer harm. (b)  The notification shall include a description of: (1)  The nature of the issue; (2)  The categories of consumers potentially affected; (3)  The deployers mitigation steps and corrective actions; and (4)  Any changes made to prevent recurrence. (c)  Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any obligation to notify consumers or government agencies under other applicable state or federal law. §480-I  Liability and unfair or deceptive acts or practices.  (a)  A deployer shall not represent, expressly or by implication, that: (1)  A consumer is required to accept an AI-generated output as accurate or binding; or (2)  The deployer is not responsible for an act or omission because an AI system generated, recommended, or performed the act. (b) A violation of this part shall constitute an unfair or deceptive act or practice under section 480-2. (c) Nothing in this part shall be construed to diminish any obligation under state or federal civil rights, fair housing, consumer credit, insurance, employment, privacy, data security, or other applicable law. §480-J  Rules. The executive director may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to implement this part, including rules: (1)  Further defining consequential decisions and high-risk AI systems based on consumer risk; (2)  Establishing minimum standards for disclosures, timing, and consumer-facing format; (3)  Establishing baseline elements for risk management programs and impact assessments proportionate to risk; and (4)  Establishing procedures for submission and protection of confidential and proprietary information." SECTION 3.  If any provision of this Act, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this Act are severable. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________